California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
An appeal may be taken from a judgment given pursuant to Section 720.390.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 98.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

720.430.

If property has been released pursuant to Section 720.170, 720.270, or 720.660, it may be levied upon or otherwise sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment only if it is determined in the hearing on the third-party claim that the debtor has an interest in the property that may be levied upon or otherwise applied to the satisfaction of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Creditor’s Demand for Third-Party Claim by Secured Party or Lienholder [720.510. - 720.550.]

720.510.

A creditor may make a demand as provided in this chapter that a secured party or lienholder file a third-party claim to personal property that has been levied upon under a writ of attachment or a writ of execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.520.

(a) The creditor’s demand for a third-party claim by the secured party or lienholder, together with a copy of the demand, shall be filed with the levying officer after levy on the personal property but before the levying officer sells the property or pays proceeds of collection to the creditor.

(b) Promptly after the demand and a copy thereof are filed, the levying officer shall personally serve the demand on the secured party or lienholder. Service of the demand on the secured party or lienholder shall be attested by the certificate of the levying officer and the
certificate shall be filed in the action promptly after service.

(c) The demand shall be served by the levying officer who levied on the property or by any other levying officer whose office is closer to the place of service. If service is made by another levying officer, such levying officer’s costs shall be paid out of the costs prepaid to the levying officer who levied on the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.530.

The demand for a third-party claim served on a secured party or lienholder shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the secured party or lienholder.

(b) The name and address of the creditor.

(c) A detailed description of the personal property levied upon and the date of levy.

(d) A statement that if the secured party or lienholder does not file a third-party claim pursuant
to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 720.210) within 30 days after service of the demand, the secured party or lienholder shall be deemed to have waived any priority the security interest or lien may have over the creditor’s lien on the property levied upon unless the property levied upon is released from the creditor’s lien.

(e) A statement that if any priority of the security interest or lien is waived, the secured party or lienholder may have a right to share in any excess proceeds of an execution sale of the property as provided in Section 701.810.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.540.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, the levying officer may not release, sell, or otherwise dispose of the personal property described in the demand before the expiration of 30 days after service of the demand on the secured party or lienholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.550.

(a) If the secured party or lienholder does not file a third-party claim with the levying officer pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 720. 210) within 30 days after service of the demand, the secured party or lienholder shall be deemed to have waived any priority the security interest or lien may have over the creditor’s lien on the personal property levied upon and the property may be applied toward the satisfaction of the judgment free of the security interest or lien.

(b) If the secured party or lienholder is deemed to have waived any priority over the
creditor’s lien pursuant to subdivision (a) and the creditor’s lien on the personal property is released, the security interest or lien is restored to its former position of priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Third-Party Undertaking to Release Property [720.610. - 720.660.]

720.610.

A third person may give an undertaking to release property pursuant to this chapter in the following cases:

(a) Where the third person claims ownership or the right to possession of real property that has been levied upon under a writ of attachment or a writ of execution.

(b) Where the third person claims ownership or the right to possession of personal property that has been levied upon under a writ of attachment, a writ of execution, or a writ of sale.

(c) Where the third person claims a security interest in or a lien on personal property that has been levied upon under a writ of attachment, a writ of execution, or a writ of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.620.

The third person shall file the undertaking to release property with the levying officer, together with two copies of the undertaking:

(a) At the time the third person files a third-party claim pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 720.110) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 720.210).

(b) If the third person has previously filed a third-party claim to the property, at any time before the levying officer does any of the following:

(1) Sells the
property.

(2) Delivers possession of the property to the creditor.

(3) Pays proceeds of collection to the creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.630.

(a) The undertaking to release property shall contain a description of the property to be released and shall describe the interest of the third person.

(b) The undertaking shall be made in favor of the creditor and shall provide that, if the debtor is finally adjudged to have an interest in the property levied upon, the third person shall pay to the creditor the lesser of the following: 

(1) The amount required to satisfy the judgment against the debtor of the creditor who had the lien on the
property.

(2) A sum equal to the market value of the debtor’s interest in the property levied upon.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and unless the third person elects to file an undertaking in a larger amount, the amount of the undertaking shall be the lesser of the following amounts:

(1) Twice the market value of the property sought to be released.

(2) Twice the amount of the creditor’s lien on the property sought to be released.

(d) If the creditor has given an undertaking in response to the third person’s claim regarding the property pursuant to Section 720.160 or 720.260, the third person’s undertaking shall be in the amount of the creditor’s undertaking.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.640.

(a) If the undertaking to release property is filed with the levying officer at the time the third-party claim is filed, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the undertaking on the creditor and on the debtor with the notice of the filing of the third-party claim served pursuant to Section 720.140 or 720.240.

(b) If the undertaking to release property is filed with the levying officer after the third-party claim is filed, not later than five days after the undertaking is filed, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the undertaking on the creditor and on the
debtor with a notice that the property will be released unless, within the time allowed as specified in the notice, the creditor objects to the undertaking. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.650.

The third person’s undertaking becomes effective when the property described therein is released pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.660.

The levying officer shall release the property described in the third person’s undertaking in the manner provided by Section 720.170 promptly after the expiration of the time allowed for objecting to the undertaking, unless the creditor has objected to the undertaking, and filed with the levying officer a copy of the notice of motion as required by Section 720.760, prior to the expiration of that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 41, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Undertakings [720.710. - 720.800.]

720.710.

The Bond and Undertaking Law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 995. 010) of Title 14) applies to a bond given pursuant to this title, except to the extent this title prescribes a different rule or is inconsistent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 41, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

720.760.

A copy of a notice of motion objecting to an undertaking shall be filed with the levying officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 14.   Effective April 21, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 40 of Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

720.770.

Unless the parties otherwise agree, the hearing on an objection to an undertaking shall be held not less than 10 nor more than 15 days after service of the notice of motion. The court may order the amount of the undertaking decreased below the amount prescribed by Section 720.160 or 720.260 if the court determines the amount prescribed exceeds the probable recovery of the beneficiary if the beneficiary ultimately prevails in proceedings to enforce the liability on the undertaking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 15.   Effective April 21, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 40 of Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

720.800.

If an undertaking has been filed with a levying officer pursuant to this division, and the undertaking remains in the levying officer’s possession when the writ is to be returned, the levying officer shall file the undertaking with the court at the time the writ is returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 5. SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENT [724.010. - 724.260.]



  CHAPTER 1. Satisfaction of Judgment [724.010. - 724.100.]

724.010.

(a) A money judgment may be satisfied by payment of the full amount required to satisfy the judgment or by acceptance by the judgment creditor of a lesser sum in full satisfaction of the judgment.

(b) Where a money judgment is satisfied by levy, the obligation of the judgment creditor to give or file an acknowledgment of satisfaction arises only when the judgment creditor has received the full amount required to satisfy the judgment from the levying officer.

(c) Where a money judgment is satisfied by
payment to the judgment creditor by check or other form of noncash payment that is to be honored upon presentation by the judgment creditor for payment, the obligation of the judgment creditor to give or file an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment arises only when the check or other form of noncash payment has actually been honored upon presentation for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.020.

The court clerk shall enter satisfaction of a money judgment in the register of actions when the following occur:

(a) A writ is returned satisfied for the full amount of a lump-sum judgment. 

(b) An acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment is filed with the court.

(c) The court orders entry of satisfaction of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.030.

When a money judgment is satisfied, the judgment creditor immediately shall file with the court an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment. This section does not apply where the judgment is satisfied in full pursuant to a writ.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.040.

If an abstract of a money judgment has been recorded with the recorder of any county and the judgment is satisfied, the judgment creditor shall immediately do both of the following:

(a) File an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment with the court.

(b) Serve an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.050.

(a) If a money judgment has been satisfied, the judgment debtor, the owner of real or personal property subject to a judgment lien created under the judgment, or a person having a security interest in or a lien on personal property subject to a judgment lien created under the judgment may serve personally or by mail on the judgment creditor a demand in writing that the judgment creditor do one or both of the following:

(1) File an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment with the court.

(2) Execute,
acknowledge, and deliver an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment to the person who made the demand.

(b) The demand shall include the following statement: “Important warning. If this judgment has been satisfied, the law requires that you comply with this demand not later than 15 days after you receive it. If a court proceeding is necessary to compel you to comply with this demand, you will be required to pay my reasonable attorney’s fees in the proceeding if the court determines that the judgment has been satisfied and that you failed to comply with the demand. In addition, if the court determines that you failed without just cause to comply with this demand within the 15 days allowed, you will be liable for all damages I sustain by reason of such failure and will also forfeit one hundred dollars to me.”

(c) If the judgment has been satisfied, the judgment creditor shall
comply with the demand not later than 15 days after actual receipt of the demand.

(d) If the judgment creditor does not comply with the demand within the time allowed, the person making the demand may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order requiring the judgment creditor to comply with the demand. The notice of motion shall be served on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If the court determines that the judgment has been satisfied and that the judgment creditor has not complied with the demand, the court shall either (1) order the judgment creditor to comply with the demand or (2) order the court clerk to enter satisfaction of the judgment.

(e) If the judgment has been satisfied and the judgment creditor fails without just cause to comply with the demand within the time allowed, the judgment creditor is liable to the person who made the
demand for all damages sustained by reason of such failure and shall also forfeit one hundred dollars ($100) to such person. Liability under this subdivision may be determined in the proceedings on the motion pursuant to subdivision (d) or in an action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.060.

(a) An acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment shall contain the following information:

(1) The title of the court.

(2) The cause and number of the action.

(3) The names and addresses of the judgment creditor, the judgment debtor, and the assignee of record if any. If an abstract of the judgment has been recorded in any county, the judgment
debtor’s name shall appear on the acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment as it appears on the abstract of judgment.

(4) The date of entry of judgment and of any renewals of the judgment and where entered in the records of the court.

(5) A statement either that the judgment is satisfied in full or that the judgment creditor has accepted payment or performance other than that specified in the judgment in full satisfaction of the judgment.

(6) A statement whether an abstract of the judgment has been recorded in any county and, if so, a statement of each county where the abstract has been recorded and the book and page of the county records where the abstract has been recorded, and a notice that the acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment (or a court clerk’s certificate of satisfaction of judgment) will have to be
recorded with the county recorder of each county where the abstract of judgment has been recorded in order to release the judgment lien on real property in that county.

(7) A statement whether a notice of judgment lien has been filed in the office of the Secretary of State and, if such a notice has been filed, a statement of the file number of such notice, and a notice that the acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment (or a court clerk’s certificate of satisfaction of judgment) will have to be filed in that office in order to terminate the judgment lien on personal property.

(b) The acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment shall be made in the manner of an acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property.

(c) The acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment shall be executed and acknowledged by one of the
following:

(1) The judgment creditor.

(2) The assignee of record.

(3) The attorney for the judgment creditor or assignee of record unless a revocation of the attorney’s authority is filed.

(4) The local child support agency director or his or her designee, if the local child support agency has been providing child support services pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code. The acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment may be recorded by the local child support agency pursuant to Section 27282 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 339, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

724.070.

(a) If a judgment creditor intentionally conditions delivery of an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment upon the performance of any act or the payment of an amount in excess of that to which the judgment creditor is entitled under the judgment, the judgment creditor is liable to the judgment debtor for all damages sustained by reason of such action or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is the greater amount.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply if the judgment creditor has agreed to deliver an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment to the judgment
debtor prior to full satisfaction of the judgment in consideration for the judgment debtor’s agreement either to furnish security or to execute a promissory note, or both, the principal amount of which does not exceed the amount to which the judgment creditor is entitled under the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.080.

In an action or proceeding maintained pursuant to this chapter, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.090.

The damages recoverable pursuant to this chapter are not in derogation of any other damages or penalties to which an aggrieved person may be entitled by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.100.

(a)If satisfaction of a judgment has been entered in the register of actions, the court clerk shall issue a certificate of satisfaction of judgment upon application therefor and payment of the fee as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 70626 of the Government Code.

(b) The certificate of satisfaction of judgment shall contain the following information:

(1) The title of the
court.

(2) The cause and number of the action.

(3) The names of the judgment creditor and the judgment debtor.

(4) The date of entry of judgment and of any renewals of the judgment and where entered in the records of the court.

(5) The date of entry of satisfaction of judgment and where it was entered in the register of actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 39.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Acknowledgment of Partial Satisfaction of Judgment [724.110. - 724.120.]

724.110.

(a)The judgment debtor or the owner of real or personal property subject to a judgment lien created under a money judgment may serve on the judgment creditor a demand in writing that the judgment creditor execute, acknowledge, and deliver an acknowledgment of partial satisfaction of judgment to the person who made the demand. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If the judgment has been partially satisfied, the judgment creditor shall comply with the demand not later than 15 days after actual receipt of the demand.

(b) If the judgment creditor does not
comply with the demand within the time allowed, the judgment debtor or the owner of the real or personal property subject to a judgment lien created under the judgment may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order requiring the judgment creditor to comply with the demand. The notice of motion shall be served on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If the court determines that the judgment has been partially satisfied and that the judgment creditor has not complied with the demand, the court shall make an order determining the amount of the partial satisfaction and may make an order requiring the judgment creditor to comply with the demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.120.

An acknowledgment of partial satisfaction of judgment shall be made in the same manner and by the same person as an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment and shall contain the following information:

(a) The title of the court.

(b) The cause and number of the action.

(c) The names and addresses of the judgment creditor, the judgment debtor, and the assignee of record if any. If an abstract of the judgment has been recorded in any county, the judgment
debtor’s name shall appear on the acknowledgment of partial satisfaction of judgment as it appears on the abstract of judgment.

(d) The date of entry of judgment and of any renewals of the judgment and where entered in the records of the court.

(e) A statement of the amount received by the judgment creditor in partial satisfaction of the judgment.

(f) A statement whether an abstract of judgment has been recorded in any county and, if so, a statement of each county where the abstract has been recorded and the book and page of the county records where the abstract has been recorded. 

(g) A statement whether a notice of judgment lien has been filed in the office of the Secretary of State and, if so, the file number of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Acknowledgment of Satisfaction of Matured Installments Under Installment Judgment [724.210. - 724.260.]

724.210.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Installment judgment” means a money judgment under which a lien may be created on an interest in real property under Section 697.320.

(b) “Matured installments” means the sum of all of the following:

(1) All amounts and installments that have matured under an installment judgment on or before the date specified in the demand for an acknowledgment of satisfaction of matured installments under an installment judgment.

(2) The interest that has accrued on the installment judgment on the date specified in the demand.

(3) The costs that have been added to the installment judgment on or before the date specified in the demand pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 685.010) of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.220.

(a) If real property is subject to a judgment lien created under an installment judgment, the judgment debtor or the owner of real property subject to the judgment lien may serve on the judgment creditor a demand in writing that the judgment creditor execute, acknowledge, and deliver to the person who made the demand an acknowledgment of satisfaction of matured installments under an installment judgment. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(b) The demand shall include the following statement: “Important warning. If the matured installments on this judgment
have been satisfied as of date specified in this demand, the law requires that you comply with this demand not later than 15 days after you receive it. (The ‛matured installments’ are all amounts and installments that are due and payable on or before the date specified in this demand together with the accrued interest to that date and costs added to the judgment on or before that date.) If a court proceeding is necessary to compel you to comply with this demand, you will be required to pay my reasonable attorney’s fees in the proceeding if the court determines that the matured installments have been satisfied and that you failed to comply with the demand. In addition, if the court determines that you failed without just cause to comply with this demand within the 15 days allowed, you will be liable for all damages I sustain by reason of such failure and will also forfeit one hundred dollars to me.”

(c) If the matured
installments have been satisfied as of the date specified in the demand, the judgment creditor shall comply with the demand not later than 15 days after actual receipt of the demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.230.

If the judgment creditor does not comply with the demand within the time allowed, the judgment debtor or the owner of the real property subject to a judgment lien created under the installment judgment may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order requiring the judgment creditor to comply with the demand. The notice of motion shall be served on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If the court determines that the matured installments have been satisfied as of the date specified in the demand and that the judgment creditor has not complied with the demand, the court shall either (1) order the
judgment creditor to comply with the demand or (2) make an order determining that the matured installments as of the date specified in the demand have been satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.240.

(a) If the matured installments under the installment judgment have been satisfied as of the date specified in the demand and the judgment creditor fails without just cause to comply with the demand within the time allowed, the judgment creditor is liable to the person who made the demand for all damages sustained by reason of such failure and shall also forfeit one hundred dollars ($100) to such person. Liability under this subdivision may be determined in the proceedings on a motion pursuant to Section 724.230 or in an action.

(b) The damages recoverable pursuant
to subdivision (a) are not in derogation of any other damages or penalties to which an aggrieved person may be entitled by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

724.250.

(a) An acknowledgment of satisfaction of matured installments under an installment judgment shall be made in the same manner and by the same person as an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment and shall contain the following information:

(1) The title of the court.

(2) The cause and number of the action.

(3) The names and addresses of the
judgment creditor, the judgment debtor, and the assignee of record if any. The judgment debtor’s name shall appear on the acknowledgment of satisfaction of matured installments as it appears on the certified copy of the judgment that was recorded to create the judgment lien.

(4) The date of entry of the judgment and of any renewals of the judgment and where entered in the records of the court.

(5) A statement that the matured installments under the installment judgment had been satisfied as of a specified date.

(6) A statement whether a certified copy or abstract of the judgment has been recorded in any county and, if so, a statement of each county where the certified or abstract copy has been recorded and the book and page of the county records where the certified copy or abstract of the judgment has been
recorded.

(b) If any amount of child or spousal support provided in a support order has been directed to be made to an officer designated by statute or by the court pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4200) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 9 of the Family Code or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4350) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Family Code or any other provision of law and the directive is set forth in the certified copy or abstract of the judgment that was recorded to create the judgment lien on real property, or in a similarly recorded certified copy or abstract of an amended or supplemental order, the acknowledgment of satisfaction of matured installments under the installment judgment is not effective and does not affect the judgment lien unless the acknowledgment is executed by or approved in writing by the designated officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

724.260.

In an action or proceeding maintained pursuant to this chapter, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.3 (Sec. 2).   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10. ACTIONS IN PARTICULAR CASES [725a. - 871.30.]



  CHAPTER 1. Actions for the Foreclosure of Mortgages [725a. - 730.5.]

725a.

The beneficiary or trustee named in a deed of trust or mortgagee named in a mortgage with power of sale upon real property or any interest therein to secure a debt or other obligation, or if there be a successor or successors in interest of such beneficiary, trustee or mortgagee, then such successor or successors in interest, shall have the right to bring suit to foreclose the same in the manner and subject to the provisions, rights and remedies relating to the foreclosure of a mortgage upon such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 45.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

(a) There can be but one form of action for the recovery of any debt or the enforcement of any right secured by mortgage upon real property or an estate for years therein, which action shall be in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. In the action the court may, by its judgment, direct the sale of the encumbered real property or estate for years therein (or so much of the real property or estate for years as may be necessary), and the application of the proceeds of the sale to the payment of the costs of court, the expenses of
 levy and sale, and the amount due plaintiff, including, where the mortgage provides for the payment of attorney’s fees, the sum for attorney’s fees as the court shall find reasonable, not exceeding the amount named in the mortgage.

(b) The decree for the foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust secured by real property or estate for years therein shall declare the amount of the indebtedness or right so secured and, unless judgment for any deficiency there may be between the sale price and the amount due with costs is waived by the judgment creditor or a deficiency judgment is prohibited by Section 580b, shall determine the personal liability of any defendant for the payment of the debt secured by the mortgage or deed of trust and shall name the defendants against whom a deficiency judgment may be ordered following the proceedings prescribed in this section. In the event of waiver, or if the prohibition of Section 580b is applicable, the
 decree shall so declare and there shall be no judgment for a deficiency. In the event that a deficiency is not waived or prohibited and it is decreed that any defendant is personally liable for the debt, then upon application of the plaintiff filed at any time within three months of the date of the foreclosure sale and after a hearing thereon at which the court shall take evidence and at which hearing either party may present evidence as to the fair value of the real property or estate for years therein sold as of the date of sale, the court shall render a money judgment against the defendant or defendants for the amount by which the amount of the indebtedness with interest and costs of levy and sale and of action exceeds the fair value of the real property or estate for years therein sold as of the date of sale. In no event shall the amount of the judgment, exclusive of interest from the date of sale and of costs exceed the difference between the amount for which the real property or estate for years
 therein was sold and the entire amount of the indebtedness secured by the mortgage or deed of trust. Notice of the hearing shall be served upon all defendants who have appeared in the action and against whom a deficiency judgment is sought, or upon their attorneys of record, at least 15 days before the date set for the hearing. Upon application of any party made at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing the court shall, and upon its own motion the court at any time may, appoint one of the probate referees provided for by law to appraise the real property or estate for years therein sold as of the time of sale. The probate referee shall file the appraisal with the clerk and the appraisal is admissible in evidence. The probate referee shall take and subscribe an oath to be attached to the appraisal that the referee has truly, honestly and impartially appraised the real property or estate for years therein to the best of the referee’s knowledge and ability. Any probate referee so appointed may be
 called and examined as a witness by any party or by the court itself. The court shall fix the compensation, in an amount as determined by the court to be reasonable, but the fees shall not exceed similar fees for similar services in the community where the services are rendered, which may be taxed and allowed in like manner as other costs.

(c) No person holding a conveyance from or under the mortgagor of real property or estate for years therein, or having a lien thereon, which conveyance or lien does not appear of record in the proper office at the time of the commencement of the action need be made a party to the action, and the judgment therein rendered, and the proceedings therein had, are as conclusive against the person holding the unrecorded conveyance or lien as if the person had been a party to the action. Notwithstanding Section 701.630, the sale of the encumbered real property or estate for years therein does not affect the interest
 of a person who holds a conveyance from or under the mortgagor of the real property or estate for years therein mortgaged, or has a lien thereon, if the conveyance or lien appears of record in the proper office at the time of the commencement of the action and the person holding the recorded conveyance or lien is not made a party to the action.

(d) If the real property or estate for years therein mortgaged consists of a single parcel, or two or more parcels, situated in two or more counties, the court may, in its judgment, direct the whole thereof to be sold in one of the counties, and upon these proceedings, and with like effect, as if the whole of the property were situated in that county.

(e) If a deficiency judgment is waived or prohibited, the real property or estate for years therein shall be sold as provided in Section 716.020. If a deficiency judgment is not waived or
 prohibited, the real property or estate for years therein shall be sold subject to the right of redemption as provided in Sections 729.010 to 729.090, inclusive.

(f) Notwithstanding this section or any other provision of law to the contrary, any person authorized by this state to make or arrange loans secured by real property or any successor in interest thereto, that originates, acquires, or purchases, in whole or in part, any loan secured directly or collaterally, in whole or in part, by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property or an estate for years therein, may bring an action for recovery of damages, including exemplary damages not to exceed 50 percent of the actual damages, against a borrower where the action is based on fraud under Section 1572 of the Civil Code and the fraudulent conduct by the borrower induced the original lender to make that loan.

(g) Subdivision (f)
 does not apply to loans secured by single-family, owner-occupied residential real property, when the property is actually occupied by the borrower as represented to the lender in order to obtain the loan and the loan is for an amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less, as adjusted annually, commencing on January 1, 1987, to the Consumer Price Index as published by the United States Department of Labor.

(h) Any action maintained pursuant to subdivision (f) for damages shall not constitute a money judgment for deficiency, or a deficiency judgment within the meaning of Section 580a, 580b, or 580d of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1095, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

726.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 726 or any other provision of law, except subdivision (d) of this section, a secured lender may elect between the following where the real property security is environmentally impaired and the borrower’s obligations to the secured lender are in default:
